Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.145

School breakfast and lunch programs—Use of state funds.

State funds received by school districts under this chapter for school breakfast and lunch programs shall be used to support the operating costs of the program, including labor, unless specific appropriations for nonoperating costs are provided.

[ 1993 c 333 s 2.]